Utah statutes.
53A-11-802.   Prohibition of corporal punishment -- Use of reasonable and necessary physical restraint or force.

(1)  A school employee may not inflict or cause the infliction of corporal punishment upon a child who is receiving services from the school, unless written permission has been given by the student's parent or guardian to do so.

(2)  This section does not prohibit the use of reasonable and necessary physical restraint or force in self defense or otherwise appropriate to the circumstances to:

(a)  obtain possession of a weapon or other dangerous object in the possession or under the control of a child;

(b)  protect the child or another person from physical injury;

(c)  remove from a situation a child who is violent or disruptive; or

(d)  protect property from being damaged.

(3) (a)  Any rule, ordinance, policy, practice, or directive which purports to direct or permit the commission of an act prohibited by this part is void and unenforceable.

(b)  An employee may not be subjected to any sanction for failure or refusal to commit an act prohibited under this part.

(4)  A parochial or private school may exempt itself from the provisions of this section by adopting a policy to that effect and notifying the parents or guardians of children in the school of the exemption.

